Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-130
Adopted person; request for information; form.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, an adopted person twenty-five years of age or older born in this state who desires access to the names of relatives or access to his or her original certificate of birth shall file a written request for such information with the department. The department shall provide a form for making such a request.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 26;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 76.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.